Tables/Contraction/en-us-g2.ctb
# the letter w
always w 2456
always W 2456
lowword was 356
sufword was\s-\s 2456-1-234-36-36
word wh =
always wh 156
word whaddaya 156-1-256-1-13456-1
midendword whart 2456-125-345-2345 Newhart
before apostrophe word which 156-24-16 which'll
word which 156
midendword whouse 2456-125-1256-234-15 Newhouse
begword widea = wideawake
word wikinews =
word will 2456
lowword were 2356
sufword were\s-\s 2456-12456-15-36-36
always where 5-156
word whereafter 5-156-1-124
word whereupon 5-156-45-136
word wherever 156-12456-5-15
sufword wingate 2456-35-1245-1-2345-15
sufword wiseacre =
largesign with 23456
always word 45-2456
word whose 45-156
always work 5-2456
always would 2456-145
contraction wd
always world 456-2456

# the letter x
always x 1346
always X 1346

# the letter y
always y 13456
always Y 13456
word you 13456
always young 5-13456
word your 13456-1235
contraction yr
word yours 13456-1235-234
contraction yrs
word yourself 13456-1235-124
contraction yrf
word yourselves 13456-1235-1236-234
contraction yrvs

# the letter z
always z 1356
always Z 1356

# heim (a German syllable) should always be literal
midendword cheim =
midendword gheim =
midendword sheim = Hergesheimer Gundersheimer Rudisheim Weinsheimer
midendword theim = Altheimer (sic)
midendword wheim =
midendword stheim 34-125-15-24-134 Westheimer

always agosom = phagosome
always ibosom = ribosome
always omosom = chromosome

# Système International Prefixes
begword yotta 13456-135-2345-2345-1 10^24
begword zetta 1356-15-2345-2345-1 10^21
# begword exa 15-1346-1 10^18
begword peta 1234-15-2345-1 10^15
begword tera 2345-12456-1 10^12
begword giga 1245-24-1245-1 10^9
begword mega 134-15-1245-1 10^6
begword kilo 13-24-123-135 10^3
begword hecto 125-15-14-2345-135 10^2
begword deca 145-15-14-1 10^1
begword deci 145-15-14-24 10^-1
begword centi 14-26-2345-24 10^-2
begword milli 134-24-123-123-24 10^-3
begword micro 134-24-14-1235-135 10^-6
begword nano 1345-1-1345-135 10^-9
begword pico 1234-24-14-135 10^-12
begword femto 124-15-134-2345-135 10^-15
begword atto 1-2345-2345-135 10^-18
begword zepto 1356-15-1234-2345-135 10^-21
begword yocto 13456-135-14-2345-135 10^-24

word thz = terahertz
word ghz = gigahertz
word chz = centihertz

begword ante =
begword anti =
begword endo 26-145-135
begword epi =
begword extra =
begword hyper 125-13456-1234-12456
begword hypo =
begword infra 35-124-1235-1
begword inter 35-2345-12456
begword intra 35-2345-1235-1
begword iso =
begword macro =
begword meta =
begword micro =
begword mono =
begword multi =
begword patho 1234-1-1456-135
begword peri 1234-12456-24
begword poly =
begword post 1234-135-34
begword pre =
begword pseudo =
begword retro =
# begword semi = seminar
begword sub =
begword super 234-136-1234-12456
begword tetra =
begword trans =
begword ultra =
# begword uni =

# other prefixes
begword electro =
begword gastro 1245-1-34-1235-135
begword neuro =
begword psycho 1234-234-13456-16-135

prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
always " 5

postpunc '' 356
postpunc ''' 3-356
always ' 3
word 'em = 
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
word 'twill =
endword 'd 3-145
endword 'll 3-123-123
endword 'm 3-134
endword 're 3-1235-15
endword 's 3-234
endword 't 3-2345
endword 've 3-1236-15

prepunc `` 236
always ` 4

midnum ^ 45
always ^ 45

always ~ 4-156
repeatable ~~~ 4-156-4-156-4-156

midnum , 2
always , 2

always ; 23

midnum : 25
always : 25
repeatable ::: 25-25-25

midnum . 46
always . 256
always ... 3-3-3
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .

always ! 235
always ? 236

always ( 2356
always ) 2356

always [ 6-2356
always ] 2356-3

always { 246
always } 12456

always # 456-1456

midnum * 4-16
always * 35-35
repeatable *** 35-35-35-35-35-35

midnum / 34
always / 456-34

always % 4-25-1234

always & 4-12346

always @ 4-1

always \\ 456-16

always | 456-1256

repeatable \s 0 space
repeatable \t 0 character tabulation
repeatable \xa0 0 no break space

always \u00A9 45-14 copyright sign
always \u00AE 45-1235 registered sign
always \u2014 36-36 em dash
always \u2122 45-2345 trade mark sign

always -com =
repeatable --- 36-36-36
always \s-\s 36-36
always \s-\scom 36-36-14-135-134

always _ 46
repeatable ___ 46-46-46

repeatable === 123456-123456-123456

# the hyphen
always ­ 36
repeatable ­­­ 36-36-36
always \s­\s 36-36
always \s\u2014\s 36-36

# accented letters
always À 6-4-1      [C0] upper a grave
always Á 6-4-1      [C1] upper a acute
always Â 6-4-1      [C2] upper a circumflex
always Ã 6-4-1      [C3] upper a tilde
always Ä 6-4-1      [C4] upper a dieresis
always Å 6-4-1      [C5] upper a ring
always Æ 6-1-15     [C6] upper ae
always Ç 6-4-14     [C7] upper c cedilla
always È 6-4-15     [C8] upper e grave
always É 6-4-15     [C9] upper e acute
always Ê 6-4-15     [CA] upper e circumflex
always Ë 6-4-15     [CB] upper e dieresis
always Ì 6-4-24     [CC] upper i grave
always Í 6-4-24     [CD] upper i acute
always Î 6-4-24     [CE] upper i circumflex
always Ï 6-4-24     [CF] upper i dieresis
always Ð 6-4-15     [D0] upper eth
always Ñ 6-4-1345   [D1] upper n tilde
always Ò 6-4-135    [D2] upper o grave
always Ó 6-4-135    [D3] upper o acute
always Ô 6-4-135    [D4] upper o circumflex
always Õ 6-4-135    [D5] upper o tilde
always Ö 6-4-135    [D6] upper o dieresis
always Ø 6-4-135    [D8] upper o slash
always Ù 6-4-136    [D9] upper u grave
always Ú 6-4-136    [DA] upper u acute
always Û 6-4-136    [DB] upper u circumflex
always Ü 6-4-136    [DC] upper u dieresis
always Ý 6-4-13456  [DD] upper y acute
always Þ 6-4-2345   [DE] upper t horn
always ß 234-234    [DF] lower ss
always à   4-1      [E0] lower a grave
always á   4-1      [E1] lower a acute
always â   4-1      [E2] lower a circumflex
always ã   4-1      [E3] lower a tilde
always ä   4-1      [E4] lower a dieresis
always å   4-1      [E5] lower a ring
always æ   1-15     [E6] lower ae
always ç   4-14     [E7] lower c cedilla
always è   4-15     [E8] lower e grave
always é   4-15     [E9] lower e acute
always ê   4-15     [EA] lower e circumflex
always ë   4-15     [EB] lower e dieresis
always ì   4-24     [EC] lower i grave
always í   4-24     [ED] lower i acute
always î   4-24     [EE] lower i circumflex
always ï   4-24     [EF] lower i dieresis
always ð   4-15     [F0] lower eth
always ñ   4-1345   [F1] lower n tilde
always ò   4-135    [F2] lower o grave
always ó   4-135    [F3] lower o acute
always ô   4-135    [F4] lower o circumflex
always õ   4-135    [F5] lower o tilde
always ö   4-135    [F6] lower o dieresis
always ø   4-135    [F8] lower o slash
always ù   4-136    [F9] lower u grave
always ú   4-136    [FA] lower u acute
always û   4-136    [FB] lower u circumflex
always ü   4-136    [FC] lower u dieresis
always ý   4-13456  [FD] lower y acute
always þ   4-2345   [FE] lower t horn
always ÿ   4-13456  [FF] lower y dieresis

# mathematical symbols
always < 126
always = 123456
always > 345
midnum + 346
always + 346
midnum - 36
always - 36
always × 46-16 multiplication sign
midnum ÷ 46-34 division sign
begnum $ 256
always $ 256

# other special characters
always © 2356-6-14-2356 copyright
always ¶ 4-1234-345 paragraph
always § 4-234-3 section
always ° 45-46-16 degrees
always ¢ 4-14 cents
always £ 4-123 pounds
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 46-134 mu

# pseudo-words
word usenet =

# abbreviations
word aarp = American Association of Retired Persons

# special character sequences
literal :// URLs
literal www.

literal .com
literal .edu
literal .gov
literal .mil
literal .net
literal .org
include countries.cti

literal .doc
literal .htm
literal .html
literal .tex
literal .txt

literal .gif
literal .jpg
literal .png
literal .wav

literal .tar
literal .zip

# d,g,r,rs,s,st,th conceive deceive declare perceive receive rejoice
# n't could must should would

# When an upper-case letter occurs inside a contraction, following a lower-case
# letter, the contraction should not be used. Example McCan

# Windows mail programs use all sorts of weird characters for apostrophes. 
# I would prefer to have all characters above 126 just show up as a 
# backslash and two hex digits.

# problems with quotation marks before and after dashes: "division"--a

# when a decimal begins with a period, it should be translated with a 
# number sign followed by a decimal point, followed by the number.

# inline contraction of emoji descriptions
emoji en
